Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6087YH (5) 91 mb/md H.F. 2737 Section 1. Section 256.9, subsection 66, Code 2026, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. Section 257.10, subsection 9, paragraph c, 3 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) The unadjusted teacher salary supplement district cost 5 is the teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil for 6 each school district for a budget year multiplied by the sum 7 of the budget enrollment for that school district plus the 8 number of resident pupils in the school district that received 9 an education savings account payment under section 257.11B for 10 the base year . 11 Sec. 3. Section 257.10, subsection 10, paragraph c, 12 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 (1) The unadjusted professional development supplement 14 district cost is the professional development supplement 15 district cost per pupil for each school district for a budget 16 year multiplied by the sum of the budget enrollment for that 17 school district plus the number of resident pupils in the 18 school district that received an education savings account 19 payment under section 257.11B for the base year . 20 Sec. 4. Section 257.10, subsection 11, paragraph c, 21 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 (1) The unadjusted early intervention supplement district 23 cost is the early intervention supplement district cost per 24 pupil for each school district for a budget year multiplied 25 by the sum of the budget enrollment for that school district 26 plus the number of resident pupils in the school district that 27 received an education savings account payment under section 28 257.11B for the base year . 29 Sec. 5. Section 257.10, subsection 12, paragraph c, 30 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 (1) The unadjusted teacher leadership supplement district 32 cost is the teacher leadership supplement district cost per 33 pupil for each school district for a budget year multiplied 34 by the sum of the budget enrollment for that school district 35 -1- LSB 6087YH (5) 91 mb/md 1/ 4 H.F. 2737 plus the number of resident pupils in the school district that 1 received an education savings account payment under section 2 257.11B for the base year . 3 Sec. 6. Section 257.11B, subsection 2, paragraph a, 4 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 (3) For the school budget years year beginning on or after 6 July 1, 2025, and the school budget year beginning July 1, 7 2026, resident pupils eligible to enroll in kindergarten 8 through grade twelve who attend a nonpublic school for the 9 applicable school budget year shall be eligible to receive an 10 education savings account payment. 11 Sec. 7. Section 257.11B, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 12 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 13 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) For the school budget year 14 beginning July 1, 2027, resident pupils eligible to enroll in 15 kindergarten through grade twelve who attend a nonpublic school 16 for that school budget year shall be eligible to receive an 17 education savings account payment if the pupilâs household has 18 an annual income less than or equal to four hundred percent of 19 the most recently revised poverty income guidelines published 20 by the United States department of health and human services. 21 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) For the school budget year 22 beginning July 1, 2028, resident pupils eligible to enroll in 23 kindergarten through grade twelve who attend a nonpublic school 24 for that school budget year shall be eligible to receive an 25 education savings account payment if the pupilâs household has 26 an annual income less than or equal to three hundred percent of 27 the most recently revised poverty income guidelines published 28 by the United States department of health and human services. 29 Sec. 8. Section 257.11B, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 30 following new subsection: 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. This section is repealed July 1, 2029. 32 Sec. 9. Section 422.7, subsection 43, Code 2026, is amended 33 by striking the subsection. 34 Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take effect July 1, 35 -2- LSB 6087YH (5) 91 mb/md 2/ 4 H.F. 2737 2029: 1 1. The section of this Act amending section 256.9, 2 subsection 66. 3 2. The section of this Act amending section 257.10, 4 subsection 9, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (1). 5 3. The section of this Act amending section 257.10, 6 subsection 10, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (1). 7 4. The section of this Act amending section 257.10, 8 subsection 11, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (1). 9 5. The section of this Act amending section 257.10, 10 subsection 12, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (1). 11 6. The section of this Act amending section 422.7. 12 Sec. 11. APPLICABILITY. The following apply July 1, 2030, 13 for school budget years beginning on or after that date: 14 1. The section of this Act amending section 257.10, 15 subsection 9, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (1). 16 2. The section of this Act amending section 257.10, 17 subsection 10, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (1). 18 3. The section of this Act amending section 257.10, 19 subsection 11, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (1). 20 4. The section of this Act amending section 257.10, 21 subsection 12, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (1). 22 Sec. 12. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to tax years 23 beginning on or after January 1, 2030: 24 The section of this division of this Act amending section 25 422.7, subsection 43. 26